Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.425

Community gardens.

A code city may authorize, by ordinance, the use of vacant or blighted city land for the purpose of community gardening under the terms and conditions established for the use of the city land set forth by the ordinance. The ordinance may establish fees for the use of the city land, provide requirements for liability insurance, and provide requirements for a deposit to use the city land, which may be refunded. The ordinance must require that a portion of the community garden include habitat beneficial for the feeding, nesting, and reproduction of all pollinators, including honey bees.

[ 2019 c 353 s 17.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 353: See note following RCW 43.23.300.